South Dakota, session 2026, HB1106.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 13-54-11 be AMENDED:
13-54-11. Immediately after a board of county commissioners votes to establish
cooperative extension work under the provisions of this chapter, the board shall appoint
a county extension board consisting of five or seven members, at least two of whom are
farmers. At least one member of the county extension board must be a member of the
board of county commissioners, who may also be one of the farmer representatives.
An individual may not be denied membership on the grounds of color, creed,
national origin, race, or sex. The membership must be representative of the racial
population mix in the county and of the various interest groups served by extension. The
members of the county extension board must be appointed for staggered terms of one-
to-three years, expiring on the tenth of January. The county extension board shall, at its
first meeting after January tenth each year, organize and elect from the members a
president, vice president, and secretary-treasurer.

26.727.10 2 1106
An Act to revise the terms of county extension board members.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1106
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1106 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1106 ENROLLED